Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
EGG-LAYING HENS

35-21-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Candling" means examining the interior of an egg by use of transmitted light sufficient to view the interior of the egg.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 224, § 7, effective July 1, 2009.)

"Consumer" means any person who buys eggs for household consumption and not for resale.

"Dealer" means any person who is engaged in selling poultry eggs or other eggs.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Edible eggs" means eggs which are free from mold, blood ring, blood spot, bloody whites, filth, stuck yolk, black rot, white rot, mixed rot, or any other inedible quality as defined by the United States department of agriculture.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 699, § 15, effective May 23, 1995.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 224, § 7, effective July 1, 2009.)

Repealed.

"Manufacturer" means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing or preparing any product intended for sale for human consumption in which eggs in any form or part are used.

(13.5) "Other eggs" means the eggs with a shell of any avian species, as designated by the commissioner by rule, other than the domesticated chicken.

"Person" means a person, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Poultry eggs", "shell eggs", or "eggs" means shell eggs of the domesticated chicken.

"Producer" means any person engaged in producing poultry eggs or other eggs in this state.

"Restaurant" means any person engaged in the business of catering or furnishing meals to the public.

Repealed.

Where applicable, the singular includes the plural; the plural, the singular; and the masculine, the feminine.

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 213, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-1.

L. 73:

p. 214, § 1.

L. 95:

(6), (8), (9), and (12) amended, p. 699, § 15, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

(1), (4), (6), (10), and (11) amended and (12), (18), and (19) repealed, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, pp. 224, 223, §§ 7, 4, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

IP, (6), and (16) amended and (13.5) added, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 712, § 3, effective June 29; IP amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1077, § 3, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection IP(1) was amended in HB 20-1211. Those amendments were superseded by the amendment to subsection IP(1) in HB 20-1343.

35-21-102. Importation, classification, and grades.

All shell eggs shall be edible eggs, and shall be candled and graded into Colorado consumer grades.

The consumer grades and weight classes for shell eggs, and standards for quality of individual shell eggs, shall be based on the United States department of agriculture grades and weight classes for shell eggs and standards for quality of individual shell eggs. The commission may adopt regulations as applicable and necessary to conform to current United States department of agriculture regulations for shell eggs.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 225, § 8, effective July 1, 2009.)

A copy of the United States department of agriculture regulations governing the grading of shell eggs and United States standards, grades, and weight classes for shell eggs shall be kept on file in the office of the commissioner and shall be open to public inspection during normal business hours.

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 215, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-2.

L. 73:

p. 214, § 2.

L. 2009:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 225, § 8, effective July 1.

35-21-103. Refrigeration - transportation.

Repealed.

All eggs shall be kept under adequate refrigeration. The refrigeration shall be such that the temperature of the eggs does not exceed the temperature established in rules adopted by the commissioner pursuant to section 35-21-106 (1).

Every vehicle used to transport eggs shall be maintained in a sanitary condition and shall be enclosed to protect eggs from extreme heat or cold.

to (9) (Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 699, § 16, effective May 23, 1995.)

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 215, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-3.

L. 73:

p. 215, § 3.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 699, § 16, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

(1) repealed and (2) and (3) amended, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, pp. 225, 226, §§ 11, 9, 12, effective July 1.

35-21-104. Licenses - application - fees - rules.

Every person selling poultry eggs or other eggs within this state shall obtain from the department a dealer's license for each place where the business is conducted. A license is not transferable. The license expires and may be renewed in accordance with rules promulgated by the commissioner. No reduction of license fee may be made for a fractional part of a year.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

An application for a license shall state:

The name of the applicant;

If the applicant is a firm, the names of its members;

If the applicant is a corporation, the names of its officers;

The location of the business;

The telephone number of the business;

Any ownership information concerning the application that the commissioner may require; and

Any contact information that the commissioner may require.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 223, § 5, effective July 1, 2009.)

The license categories shall be established by rule by the commissioner based on the average number of cases of poultry eggs (thirty dozen per case) or other eggs sold per week during the previous twelve months.

The commission may establish a late fee for a license renewed after it has expired.

Fees for each license category shall be as established by the commission.

The applicant for a license shall keep such records as may be necessary to indicate accurately the quantity of poultry eggs or other eggs sold per week during the year and shall allow the commissioner to examine these records in determining the quantity of poultry eggs or other eggs sold. A licensee shall retain the records of quantity sold for two years.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23, 1995.)

For the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2007, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the agricultural commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover all of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this part 1.

All license fees shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, pp. 200, 217, §§ 16, 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-4.

L. 73:

p. 216, § 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 700, § 17, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(4)(a), (4)(b), and (5) amended, p. 1731, § 14, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(4)(a), (4)(b), and (5) amended, p. 1272, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4)(a), (4)(b), and (5) amended and (4)(j) added, p. 1907, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (3)(d), (3)(e), (4)(a), and (4)(b) amended, (3)(f) and (3)(g) added, and (4)(e) repealed, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, pp. 223, 226, 225, §§ 5, 13, 10, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1), (4)(b)(I), and (4)(b)(IV) amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 712, § 4, effective June 29; (4)(j) amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1077, § 4, effective September 14.

35-21-105. Exemption - rules.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who produces and sells only on the premises at which the poultry eggs were produced, at a farmers' market, or through a community-supported agricultural organization, less than two hundred fifty dozen poultry eggs per month is exempt from this part 1; except that such a producer may apply for a dealer's license and, if in compliance with this part 1, be issued a dealer's license.

The commissioner may promulgate rules exempting small producers of other eggs or dealers of other eggs from any provision of this part 1 and setting the conditions for the exemption; except that such a producer may apply for a dealer's license and, if in compliance with this part 1, be issued a dealer's license.

A person transporting eggs for sale at a farmers' market or similar venue under subsection (1) of this section shall:

Comply with the transport requirements of section 35-21-103 (3) and any rules, including rules requiring refrigeration, promulgated under this part 1 regarding the safe transport and washing of eggs; and

Affix to the egg package a label containing the address at which the eggs originated and the date on which the eggs were packaged. Any eggs not treated for salmonella must also include the following statement on the package: "Safe Handling Instructions: To prevent illness from bacteria, keep eggs refrigerated, cook eggs until yolks are firm, and cook any foods containing eggs thoroughly. These eggs do not come from a government-approved source."

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 220, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-5.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 224, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-048), ch. 16, p. 44, § 7, effective March 15.

L. 2013:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 13-1158), ch. 100, p. 319, § 4, effective April 4.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 712, § 5, effective June 29; (1) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1077, § 5, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2805, § 32, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) was amended in HB 20-1211. Those amendments were harmonized in part with and superseded in part by the amendment of subsection (1) in HB 20-1343.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 16, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

35-21-106. Rules - commissioner to enforce - procedure.

The commissioner may formulate rules concerning licensing, transporting, processing, labeling, sale, storage, inspection, and record keeping for the furtherance and enforcement of this part 1 for both poultry eggs and other eggs. The commissioner shall promulgate the rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24.

The commissioner is responsible for enforcing this article. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall have access during regular business hours to business premises, facilities, vehicles, and records pertinent to activities regulated under this article.

If the commissioner determines that this article 21 or the rules promulgated for the enforcement of this article 21 are being violated, the commissioner may cause "stop sale notices" to be placed on all poultry eggs or other eggs being sold or offered for sale in violation of this article 21 or the rules. A person shall not sell or otherwise dispose of poultry eggs or other eggs upon which a "stop sale notice" has been issued until the "stop sale notice" has been canceled by the commissioner or a duly authorized agent.

If an authorized person from the department requests to inspect poultry eggs or other eggs, it is unlawful for a person to refuse to submit for inspection the following or to refuse to stop a vehicle transporting the following:

Poultry eggs;

Other eggs;

Poultry egg products; or

Other egg products.

Any authorized agent of the department may, while enforcing this article 21, seize and hold as evidence any carton or container of poultry eggs or other eggs received, packed, stored, delivered for shipment, loaded, or in transit in violation of this article 21.

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 220, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-6.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 703, § 18, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 226, §§ 14, 15, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1), (2)(b), and (3) amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 713, § 6, effective June 29; (1) amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1077, § 6, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) was amended in HB 20-1211. Those amendments were harmonized in part with and superseded in part by the amendment of subsection (1) in HB 20-1343.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-21-107. Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is the duty of the commissioner to notify the district attorney of the judicial district in which a violation occurs, and the district attorney of said district shall conduct such proceedings as may be necessary with the cooperation of the commissioner. Upon conviction in any court of competent jurisdiction, any person in violation of this part 1 shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars. Each calendar day on which such a violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation. Fines and penalties imposed under this part 1 shall be collected and remitted as provided by law.

After proper hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, the commissioner may deny an application for licensure, place a licensee on probation, or restrict, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of a person who violates this part 1 or any rule adopted under this part 1. The restriction, revocation, or suspension of or refusal to renew a license may be in addition to, or in lieu of, any penalties or fines imposed in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 65:

R&RE, p. 220, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-9-7.

L. 73:

p. 217, § 5.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 704, § 19, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1077, § 7, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) is repealed, effective September 1, 2031, pursuant to § 35-21-108.

35-21-107.5. Civil penalties.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty on any person who violates this part 1 or any rule adopted under this part 1. The penalty must not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars per day per violation.

Before imposing a civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the violator to stay in business.

The commissioner shall not impose a civil penalty unless the person charged is given notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Upon a finding that the commissioner did not have probable cause to impose a civil penalty, the person charged may recover from the department such person's costs and attorney fees.

If the commissioner is unable to collect a civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or any portion of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the commissioner may recover the amount of the penalty, plus costs and attorney fees, by action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

The commissioner shall transmit civil penalties collected under this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the general fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 704, § 20, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1733, § 15, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1274, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 1909, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(4) amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 713, § 7, effective June 29; (1)(a) amended, (HB 20-1343), ch. 217, p. 1078, § 8, effective September 14.

35-21-108. Repeal of sections - review of functions.

Sections 35-21-104 and 35-21-107 (2) and this section are repealed, effective September 1, 2031. Before the repeal, the licensing functions of the department are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 933, § 26, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 333, § 20, effective April 3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 690, § 65, effective April 20.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 704, § 21, effective May 23.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 349, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-127), ch. 63, p. 223, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1211), ch. 159, p. 711, § 2, effective June 29.